test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_lyeme_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - lyeme: # eres
  
    lyeme+N+Sg+Nom: lyeme
    lyeme+N+Sg+Gen: luámmán
    lyeme+N+Sg+Acc: luámmán
    lyeme+N+Sg+Ill: luáˊṃánân
    lyeme+N+Sg+Loc: luáˊṃánist
    lyeme+N+Sg+Com: luáˊṃánáin
    lyeme+N+Sg+Abe: luámmánttáá
    lyeme+N+Ess: [luáˊṃánin, lyemeen]
    lyeme+N+Par: [luáˊṃánid, lyemeed]
    lyeme+N+Pl+Nom: luáˊṃáneh
    lyeme+N+Pl+Gen: luáˊṃánij
    lyeme+N+Pl+Acc: luáˊṃánijd
    lyeme+N+Pl+Ill: luáˊṃánáid
    lyeme+N+Pl+Loc: luáˊṃánijn
    lyeme+N+Pl+Com: luáˊṃánijguin
    lyeme+N+Pl+Abe: luáˊṃánijttáá

  Noun - siämu: # eres - ok
    siämu+N+Sg+Nom: siämu
    siämu+N+Sg+Gen: siämmun
    siämu+N+Sg+Acc: siämmun
    siämu+N+Sg+Ill: siäˊṃunân
    siämu+N+Sg+Loc: siäˊṃunist
    siämu+N+Sg+Com: siäˊṃunáin
    siämu+N+Sg+Abe: siämmunttáá
    siämu+N+Ess: [siämun, siäˊṃunin]
    siämu+N+Par: [siämud, siäˊṃunid]
    siämu+N+Pl+Nom: siäˊṃuneh
    siämu+N+Pl+Gen: siäˊṃunij
    siämu+N+Pl+Acc: siäˊṃunijd
    siämu+N+Pl+Ill: siäˊṃunáid
    siämu+N+Pl+Loc: siäˊṃunijn
    siämu+N+Pl+Com: siäˊṃunijguin
    siämu+N+Pl+Abe: siäˊṃunijttáá

  Noun - siemâ: # eres - ok
    siemâ+N+Sg+Nom: siemâ
    siemâ+N+Sg+Gen: siemmân
    siemâ+N+Sg+Acc: siemmân
    siemâ+N+Sg+Ill: sieˊṃânân
    siemâ+N+Sg+Loc: sieˊṃânist
    siemâ+N+Sg+Com: sieˊṃânáin
    siemâ+N+Sg+Abe: siemmânttáá
    siemâ+N+Ess: [siemân, sieˊṃânin]
    siemâ+N+Par: [siemâd, sieˊṃânid]
    siemâ+N+Pl+Nom: sieˊṃâneh
    siemâ+N+Pl+Gen: sieˊṃânij
    siemâ+N+Pl+Acc: sieˊṃânijd
    siemâ+N+Pl+Ill: sieˊṃânáid
    siemâ+N+Pl+Loc: sieˊṃânijn
    siemâ+N+Pl+Com: sieˊṃânijguin
    siemâ+N+Pl+Abe: sieˊṃânijttáá

  Noun - siemâ: # eres - ok
    siemâ+N+Sg+Nom: siemâ
    siemâ+N+Sg+Gen: siemmân
    siemâ+N+Sg+Acc: siemmân
    siemâ+N+Sg+Ill: sieˊṃânân
    siemâ+N+Sg+Loc: sieˊṃânist
    siemâ+N+Sg+Com: sieˊṃânáin
    siemâ+N+Sg+Abe: siemmânttáá
    siemâ+N+Ess: [siemân, sieˊṃânin]
    siemâ+N+Par: [siemâd, sieˊṃânid]
    siemâ+N+Pl+Nom: sieˊṃâneh
    siemâ+N+Pl+Gen: sieˊṃânij
    siemâ+N+Pl+Acc: sieˊṃânijd
    siemâ+N+Pl+Ill: sieˊṃânáid
    siemâ+N+Pl+Loc: sieˊṃânijn
    siemâ+N+Pl+Com: sieˊṃânijguin
    siemâ+N+Pl+Abe: sieˊṃânijttáá

  Noun - riesâ: # eres - ok
    riesâ+N+Sg+Nom: riesâ
    riesâ+N+Sg+Gen: riessâm
    riesâ+N+Sg+Acc: riessâm
    riesâ+N+Sg+Ill: rieˊṣâmân
    riesâ+N+Sg+Loc: rieˊṣâmist
    riesâ+N+Sg+Com: rieˊṣâmáin
    riesâ+N+Sg+Abe: riessâmttáá
    riesâ+N+Ess: [riesân, rieˊṣâmin]
    riesâ+N+Par: [riesâd, rieˊṣâmid]
    riesâ+N+Pl+Nom: rieˊṣâmeh
    riesâ+N+Pl+Gen: rieˊṣâmij
    riesâ+N+Pl+Acc: rieˊṣâmijd
    riesâ+N+Pl+Ill: rieˊṣâmáid
    riesâ+N+Pl+Loc: rieˊṣâmijn
    riesâ+N+Pl+Com: rieˊṣâmijguin
    riesâ+N+Pl+Abe: rieˊṣâmijttáá
